Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2001
Act, how cited.

Sections 21-2001 to 21-20,197 shall be known and
may be cited as the Business Corporation Act.

Laws 1995, LB 109, § 1;

Laws 1996, LB 1036, § 4;

Laws 2001, LB 138, § 2;

Laws 2012, LB1018, § 1.